Maryland, session 2026, SB0498.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
28–202.
There is a Washington County Salary Study Commission.
28–203.
(a) Subject to subsections (b) and (d) of this section, the Commission consists of
the following members:
(1) one member from the Democratic Central Committee of Washington
County;
(2) one member from the Republican Central Committee of Washington
County;
(3) one member from the Washington County Chamber of Commerce;
(4) one member from the Washington County Farm Bureau;
– 1 –

Ch. 589 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) one member from the League of Women Voters of Washington County;
(6) one member from the Western Maryland Central Labor Council;
(7) one member from the [Cumberland Valley Associated Builders and
Contractors, Inc.] WASHINGTON COUNTY HOME BUILDERS ASSOCIATION, INC.;
(8) one member from the Joint Veterans Council of Washington County;
and
(9) one at–large member who is a resident selected by the County
Commissioners of Washington County.
(b) Each member shall be a registered voter of Washington County who in the
previous 4 years has voted in at least two elections, at least one of which was in the
gubernatorial election year.
(c) On or before March 31, 2016, and on or before March 31 each fourth year
thereafter, the County Commissioners of Washington County shall request that each
organization listed in subsection (a) of this section recommend an appointee to the county
commissioners on or before the following May 15.
(d) (1) The County Commissioners of Washington County shall appoint the
individual recommended by each organization listed in subsection (a) of this section.
(2) If an organization fails to make a recommendation to the county
commissioners on or before June 1, the members who have been appointed to the
Commission shall meet, solicit prospective members from the public, and select by majority
vote a qualified substitute public member to the Commission to serve through the following
December 1.
(3) A member of the Commission may not be an elected official or an
employee of an official whose salary the Commission studies.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –